Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 23 Adaptive Telephone Equipment Loan Program Committee

39-23-1.
Committee — Composition.

There is hereby created within the department of human services a permanent committee to be known as the adaptive telephone equipment loan program committee. This committee shall advise on the program and shall consist of fifteen (15) members, one of whom shall be from the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be from the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a representative of the telephone company, to be appointed by its chief executive officer; one of whom shall be a representative of the public utilities commission, to be appointed by the chairperson of the public utilities commission; and eleven (11) of whom shall be appointed by the governor as follows: seven (7) consumers, including at least one from each of the following communities: the hard of hearing or deaf community, the speech-impaired community, and the neuromuscular-impaired community; one professional member who shall be an audiologist, physician, or speech pathologist, and three (3) members of the general public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 115, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 83; P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 1.

39-23-2.
Duties.

The duties of the committee shall include but not be limited to advising on the implementation of the telecommunications device for the impaired distribution program authorized by §

39-1-42(a)(2)

, and providing periodic review of activities, policies, regulations, procedures, programs, and operation of the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 15.

39-23-3.
Reports and recommendations.

The committee shall, from time to time, and at least annually, report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies, and make such recommendations to the general assembly and propose such legislation or initiate such studies as it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 2.

39-23-4.
Place of meeting.

The committee shall meet at such times and places as in the judgment of the committee will best serve the convenience of all parties in interest. The members of the committee shall receive no salary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 48, § 2.

39-23-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 135, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 3, 2004; and by P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 2, effective July 7, 2004.

39-23-6.
Terms of office and officers.

Of the number of members appointed by the governor originally under this chapter, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of one year; one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, vacancies created by expiration of terms shall be filled with appointments for terms of three (3) years. Members whose terms expire may be reappointed to succeed themselves. The committee shall elect from its own membership a chairperson, vice chairperson, and other officers as deemed necessary annually. The committee may appoint such personnel as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the duties prescribed by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 115, § 3.